Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF788.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 HF 788 (3) 91 th/ns/md H.F. 788 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 321.270 Required alcohol and 1 drug analysis for state employees operating state-owned motor 2 vehicles. 3 1. A state employee who was involved in an accident or 4 collision resulting in serious injury or death while operating 5 a motor vehicle owned by the state shall provide a specimen of 6 the personâs urine for analysis of the specimen to determine 7 the alcohol concentration or presence of a controlled substance 8 or other drugs, if there is probable cause that the person 9 was operating a motor vehicle in violation of section 321J.2 10 or 321J.2A. The person shall provide the specimen to a peace 11 officer as soon as practicable within two hours after the 12 person is involved in the accident or collision. 13 2. A specimen provided under this section shall be analyzed 14 in a manner in accordance with chapter 321J to determine the 15 alcohol concentration or presence of a controlled substance or 16 other drugs. 17 3. The person may have an independent analysis performed 18 on the provided specimen, administered at the personâs own 19 expense. The failure or inability of the person to obtain 20 an independent analysis does not preclude the admission of 21 evidence of the results of the analysis administered pursuant 22 to this section. Upon the request of the person who provided a 23 specimen, the results of the analysis administered pursuant to 24 this section shall be made available to the person. 25 4. This section does not apply if a blood, breath, or urine 26 specimen is taken pursuant to chapter 321J. 27 5. For purposes of this section, âserious injuryâ means the 28 same as defined in section 702.18. 29 -1- HF 788 (3) 91 th/ns/md 1/ 1